Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.58.020

Alteration and vacation of plats.

The provisions of *chapters 58.11 and 58.12 RCW shall apply in appropriate cases to the alteration or vacation of plats including land or lots within a code city or the vacation of streets therein as provided in chapter 35.79 RCW. The vacation of waterways within a code city shall be governed by the provisions of **chapter 79.16 RCW.

[ 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.58.020.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: *(1) Chapters 58.11 and 58.12 RCW were repealed by 1987 c 354 s 8.

**(2) Chapter 79.16 RCW was repealed by 1982 1st ex.s. c 21 s 183. For later enactment, see chapters 79.90 through 79.96 RCW. Chapters 79.90 through 79.96 RCW were subsequently recodified as chapters 79.105 through 79.140 RCW pursuant to 2005 c 155.